Utah statutes.
48-2c-205.   Penalty for signing false documents.

A person who signs a document or report knowing it to be false in any material respect, with the intent that the document or report be delivered to the division for filing, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

